Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2603
Assistive device, defined.

Assistive device means any device, including a demonstrator, that a consumer purchases or accepts transfer of in this state which is used for a major life activity, including, but not limited to, manual wheelchairs, motorized wheelchairs, motorized scooters, and other aides that enhance the mobility of an individual; hearing instruments, telephone communication devices for the deaf (TTY), assistive listening devices, and other aides that enhance an individual's ability to hear; voice synthesized computer modules, optical scanners, talking software, braille printers, and other devices that enhance a sight-impaired individual's ability to communicate; environmental control units; and any other assistive device that enables a person with a disability to communicate, see, hear, or maneuver.

Laws 1997, LB 802, § 3;

Laws 2009, LB195, § 52.